Hawaii statutes.
§121-37 Failure to return arms, etc.
Every member of the militia who wilfully neglects to return to the armory or
headquarters of the unit to which the member belongs, any arms, uniform, or
equipment issued to the member by the State or its officers, within six days
after being notified by the member's commanding officer to do so, shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding $50 or
imprisonment for not more than thirty days. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS
§121-37; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Classification of
offense and authorized punishment, see §§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next